Vermont, session 2025-2026, H594.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this act to:
(1) ensure that narrowly tailored, temporary emergency housing
assistance is available to only the most vulnerable Vermonters in crisis through
fiscal year 2028 in a manner that encourages efficient and accountable use of
taxpayer funds;
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 2 of 30
(2) establish clear eligibility criteria, accountability measures, and case
management requirements;
(3) transition from reliance on hotels and motels toward sustainable,
permanent housing solutions, including recovery housing, transitional housing,
and the Vermont Housing Investment Program (VHIP);
(4) establish a tiered continuum of care;
(5) expand the use of alternative emergency housing models in
partnership with municipalities, nonprofit community-based providers, and
private landlords;
(6) integrate supportive services to assist households to achieve
permanent housing stability;
(7) establish transparent accountability measures, reporting
requirements, and oversight mechanisms;
(8) support self-sufficiency among Program participants by requiring
personal responsibility and active participation in housing searches;
(9) empower local communities to administer emergency housing
programs with maximum flexibility; and
(10) create a diversified system of emergency housing options, such as
shelters, transitional housing, recovery residences, shared housing
arrangements, host-home models, master-leased units, and rapid rehousing
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 3 of 30
placements, that provide cost-effective, sustainable, and supportive outcomes
to Program participants.
Sec. 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this act:
(1) “Administering agency” means the department, office, or designated
entity responsible for implementing and overseeing the provisions of this act.
(2) “Alternative housing options” means housing options such as
shelters, transitional housing, recovery residences, shared housing
arrangements, host-home models, master-leased units, and rapid rehousing
placements.
(3) “Applicant” means an individual or household that applies for
emergency housing assistance under this act.
(4) “Case management services” means individualized supports
connecting households to public benefits, health care, employment, and
permanent housing.
(5) “Cold-weather emergency shelter” means publicly funded shelter
beds made available to individuals during periods when temperatures or
weather conditions pose a risk to health and safety.
(6) “Department” means the Department for Children and Families.
(7) “Disability” means a physical, sensory, cognitive, developmental, or
mental health condition that substantially limits one or more major life
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 4 of 30
activities, or that requires ongoing support, accommodation, or treatment to
maintain an individual’s health, safety, or independence. The term includes
chronic or episodic conditions that significantly impact daily functioning,
regardless of whether the individual is receiving, or is eligible to receive,
federal disability benefits.
(8) “Eligible individual” or “eligible household” means an individual or
group of individuals, respectively, without a fixed nighttime residence or at
immediate risk of losing housing within seven days, as verified by an
administering agency.
(9) “Emergency housing” means temporary shelter, lodging, or other
housing support provided to eligible individuals or eligible households when
no safe alternative housing option is immediately available.
(10) “Emergency housing assistance” means the provision of shelter,
temporary accommodations, or related services necessary to protect the health,
safety, and welfare of eligible individuals and eligible households.
(11) “Homeless” means lacking a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime
residence, including individuals and households that:
(A) reside in places not meant for human habitation, such as cars,
parks, abandoned buildings, or streets;
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 5 of 30
(B) reside in emergency shelters or temporary housing;
(C) are exiting an institution where they temporarily resided and have
no permanent housing to return to; or
(D) are at imminent risk of losing their primary nighttime residence,
as determined by the administering agency.
(12) “Household” means an individual or group of individuals, with or
without children, who present together for emergency housing assistance and
who identify as a unit for purposes of obtaining shelter or housing.
(13) “Minor child” means an individual under 18 years of age.
(14) “Program” means the Temporary Emergency Housing and
Accountability Program.
(15) “Recovery housing” means sober, supportive housing specifically
designed for individuals in recovery from substance use disorder.
(16) “Survivor of domestic violence” means an individual who has
experienced domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, or human trafficking
and who is seeking emergency housing to avoid further harm or abuse.
(17) “Transitional housing” means time-limited housing with services
designed to support residents in achieving permanent housing stability.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 6 of 30
Sec. 3. TEMPORARY EMERGENCY HOUSING AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM
(a) Program established. In fiscal years 2027 and 2028, there is established
the Temporary Emergency Housing and Accountability Program, administered
by the Department for Children and Families’ Economic Services Division, for
the purposes of:
(1) providing temporary emergency housing to eligible individuals and
eligible households experiencing homelessness or at imminent risk of
homelessness;
(2) reducing reliance on hotels and motels for emergency housing
assistance;
(3) expanding the use of alternative housing options in partnership with
community organizations, municipalities, and private landlords;
(4) integrating case management and individualized housing plans into
all emergency housing placements; and
(5) ensuring accountability, transparency, and cost efficiency in the use
of public funds.
(b) Tiered continuum of care. The Department shall implement a tiered
continuum of care framework to serve individuals and families experiencing
homelessness, including those receiving emergency housing assistance
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 7 of 30
pursuant to this act. The continuum of care shall consist of the following tiers,
listed in order of priority and progression:
(1) Tier 1: high-barrier shelter first option.
(A) High-barrier shelters shall serve as the preferred initial placement
for eligible individuals and eligible households where capacity, staffing, and
geographic accessibility are available. High-barrier shelters shall provide
structured rules, mandatory participation in case management, and Program
accountability measures.
(B) Individuals placed in a high-barrier shelter shall have the ability
to participate in structured programming, including mandatory case
management, housing stability planning, and employment, education, or
treatment services, as appropriate, and have the physical and behavioral ability
to comply with Program expectations.
(C) Hotels and motels shall only be used for temporary overflow
during periods of shelter capacity shortage, subject to the limitation in Sec. 8 of
this act.
(2) Tier 1A: low-barrier shelter option.
(A) Low-barrier shelters shall serve eligible individuals or eligible
households unable or unwilling to participate immediately in high-barrier
shelters.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 8 of 30
(B) Low-barrier shelters shall minimize barriers to entry by reducing
the rules and programmatic requirements used in high-barrier shelters, while
requiring access to case management and other housing support services.
(C) The Department shall prioritize individuals in a low-barrier
shelter for transition to a high-barrier shelter or housing as described in
subdivision (3) of this subsection (b) as soon as feasible.
(3) Tier 2: transitional and recovery housing.
(A) Time-limited housing with structured support services shall
stabilize and prepare eligible individuals and eligible households for permanent
housing.
(B) Transitional and recovery housing shall include housing for
individuals exiting treatment for substance use disorder or with a history of
substance use disorder.
(4) Tier 2A: permanent and temporary supportive housing.
(A) Temporary or permanent supportive housing programs shall be
provided to eligible individuals and eligible households requiring ongoing or
intensive supports to maintain housing stability.
(i) Permanent supportive housing shall provide long-term, non-
time-limited housing combined with voluntary supportive services for
individuals with complex needs, including chronic homelessness, serious
mental illness, or long-term recovery needs.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 9 of 30
(ii) Temporary supportive housing may include time-limited
supportive units to serve as a bridge for eligible individuals and eligible
households transitioning from shelter to transitional housing, but who are not
yet ready for independent living.
(B) Supportive services may include case management, mental health
and substance use treatment coordination, peer support, life skills, tenancy
support, and employment services.
(C) Tier 2A serves as an intermediate stabilization option prior to tier
3 long-term housing placements or, when appropriate, as the final permanent
placement for eligible individuals and eligible households requiring indefinite
supportive services.
(5) Tier 3: Vermont Housing Investment Program (VHIP) and
permanent housing. This tier provides for long-term, stable housing solutions,
including subsidized units, VHIP-supported units, and repurposed hotels and
motels, previously used for General Assistance emergency housing, that are
now converted workforce or transitional housing.
(c) Tiered placement requirements.
(1) Eligible individuals and eligible households shall be placed in the
highest-need tier appropriate to the individual’s or household’s circumstances,
with high-barrier shelter as the default placement, except where low-barrier
shelter is necessary to ensure immediate shelter access.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 10 of 30
(2) Movement between tiers shall prioritize progress toward permanent
housing, minimizing reliance on temporary hotel or motel placements.
(3) An eligible individual or eligible household shall not be denied
placement, sanctioned, or deemed noncompliant under this section due to the
unavailability of shelter beds, housing placements, case management services,
treatment capacity, or other system resources outside the control of the eligible
individual or household.
(d) Coordination and reporting.
(1) The Department shall coordinate services provided in high-barrier
shelters, low-barrier shelters, transitional housing programs, VHIP units,
recovery housing units, and cold-weather shelters to ensure efficient use of
resources.
(2) Eligible individuals’ or eligible households’ placement, duration of
stay, and progression through the tiers established in subsection (b) of this
section shall be reported pursuant to Sec. 15 of this act.
(e) Prioritization. The tiered continuum of care established in subsection
(b) of this section shall prioritize eligible individuals and eligible households
that meet multiple vulnerability criteria, including disability, age, chronic
homelessness, and domestic violence status.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 11 of 30
Sec. 4. ELIGIBILITY
(a) General eligibility.
(1) Eligible individuals and eligible households in the Temporary
Emergency Housing and Accountability Program established in this act shall
be in need of emergency housing assistance and physically present in Vermont
as verified by one or more of the following:
(A) a Vermont-issued driver’s license or identification card;
(B) a lease or utility bill for a Vermont property or other proof of
presence in the State; or
(C) documentation from a Vermont-based social service provider or
health care provider licensed or certified and practicing in Vermont.
(2) Recent Program violations or misconduct shall render an otherwise
eligible individual temporarily ineligible for participation in the Program.
(3) The Department shall prioritize services to vulnerable populations,
including individuals with verified disabilities; individuals over 60 years of
age; individuals who are pregnant; parents or guardians caring for minor
children; and survivors of domestic violence, sexual assault, or human
trafficking.
(4) For nonemergency needs and longer-term supports under the
Program, the Department may consider domicile in and connection to
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 12 of 30
Vermont. However, no individual shall be denied emergency life-safety shelter
solely on the basis of citizenship or immigration status.
(b) Verification of residency.
(1) Eligibility for emergency housing assistance under the Program shall
be based on an individual’s or household’s current physical presence in
Vermont and verified need. The Department may consider domicile in and
connection to Vermont for nonemergency needs pursuant to subdivision (a)(4)
of this section, but emergency life-safety shelter shall not be denied solely on
the basis of citizenship or immigration status.
(2) For emergency placements, the Department shall accept any
reasonable documentation evidencing identity and presence in the State,
including government-issued identification, administering agency
documentation, or self-attestation corroborated by collateral information when
other documentation is not reasonably available.
(3) For nonemergency needs, the Department shall accept reasonable
documentation of domicile in or connection to Vermont in a manner specified
by the Commissioner for Children and Families in rule. Domicile in and
connection to Vermont may be verified for nonemergency supports and
redetermined periodically or when the individual’s or household’s
circumstances change.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 13 of 30
(4) All documentation submitted pursuant to this section shall be subject
to verification by the Department, in coordination with the Departments of
Taxes and of Motor Vehicles.
(5) The Department shall permit presumptive eligibility for a period of
up to 14 days for applicants who attest to meeting the residency requirement
but lack immediate access to the required documentation, provided that
documentation is actively pursued during the presumptive eligibility period.
(c) Verification of disability.
(1) Proof of an individual’s disability shall be verified by:
(A) a health care provider licensed or certified and practicing in
Vermont;
(B) a determination or certification from a State or federally
recognized agency or program that provides services to individuals with
disabilities;
(C) documentation from an educational institution, service provider,
or social service agency in Vermont with knowledge of the individual’s
disability; or
(D) a self-attestation by the individual, subject to verification by the
administering agency, when other documentation is not reasonably available.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 14 of 30
(2) An individual shall not be required to establish eligibility for the
Temporary Emergency Housing and Accountability Program solely through a
federal disability benefits determination or award.
(3) The status of an individual with a disability shall be verified during
the individual’s initial application process and redetermined as appropriate, at
most every 36 months or upon a material change in condition, with flexible
acceptance of provider notes, benefit statements, or self-attestation
corroborated by collateral information.
(d) Fraud prevention.
(1) An applicant or Program participant who knowingly provides false,
misleading, or incomplete information regarding residency, disability status,
household composition, or other eligibility criteria shall be subject to:
(A) immediate denial or termination of benefits under the Program;
and
(B) repayment of improperly received benefits, which shall be
recovered through administrative or civil processes.
(2) The Department may refer cases suspected of fraud to the Office of
the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney for investigation and prosecution
under applicable State law.
(3) The Department shall provide clear written notice to all applicants
regarding penalties for fraud at the time of application.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 15 of 30
(4) The Department shall not impose a penalty upon an individual or
household for a good-faith, immaterial error that was corrected upon notice
within a reasonable time period.
Sec. 5. ACCOUNTABILITY AND CASE MANAGEMENT
(a)(1) A participant in the Program shall be required to:
(A) participate in ongoing case management services with a State-
contracted case manager;
(B) comply with an individualized housing stability plan, including
participation in employment, treatment, or housing search activities as
appropriate; and
(C) abide by Program rules.
(2) The Department and its contractors shall comply with Title II of the
Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq. and Section 504 of
the Rehabilitation Act, 29 U.S.C. § 794, for the purposes of providing
reasonable modifications, effective communication, and accessible placements.
Program rules, case management requirements, and sanctions shall be
reasonably modified as necessary to avoid discrimination against qualified
individuals with a disability.
(3) Eligible individuals and eligible households shall have secular
alternatives to any faith-based or ideological programming. The Department
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 16 of 30
shall not penalize an eligible individual or eligible household for declining
religious activities.
(b) An individual shall be ineligible for assistance for 30 days under the
Program, unless extenuating circumstances are documented by the
Department, when the individual knowingly and willfully:
(1) fails to check into assigned housing;
(2) refuses to comply with Program commitments, responsibilities, and
obligations;
(3) declines an alternative housing option; or
(4) engages in behavior that the Department identifies as misconduct.
(c) Sanctions issued under this section shall not be imposed when the
eligible individual’s noncompliance is primarily attributable to cognitive
impairment, active mental health crisis, substance withdrawal, developmental
disability, or other documented condition that materially limits the individual’s
ability to comply, unless reasonable accommodations have been offered and
documented.
(d) Reapplication after sanction shall require a new eligibility
determination, verification of compliance with housing search requirements,
and participation in relevant services.
(e) An individual engaged in criminal activity may be subject to immediate
termination where necessary for the safety of the individual, other Program
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 17 of 30
participants, or Program staff, followed by a prompt post-deprivation hearing
within 10 days following the termination. Otherwise, termination in the
Program shall only occur after the Department provides notice to the eligible
individual including a written decision stating the findings and reasons for the
Department’s decision, and an opportunity to be heard.
(f) The Department shall allocate funds sufficient to ensure that case
management services are delivered in ratios not to exceed:
(1) one case manager per 25 participants in high-barrier shelter
placements; and
(2) one case manager per 35 participants in low-barrier, transitional, or
supportive housing placements.
(g) As used in this section, “misconduct” means enumerated behaviors that
materially endanger the safety of others, involve the destruction of property, or
constitute repeated refusals of suitable placements following a documented
suitability assessment and reasonable accommodations.
Sec. 6. TIME LIMITS FOR PROGRAM PARTICIPATION
(a) Assistance under the Program shall be time-limited by tier as follows:
(1) Tier 1 and tier 1A placements shall not exceed 60 days.
(2) Tier 2 and tier 2A placements shall not exceed 180 days.
(b) Time limits shall be tolled during periods in which an eligible
individual or eligible household is actively awaiting placement in housing,
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 18 of 30
treatment, or services for which the eligible individual or eligible household is
otherwise eligible.
(c) The Department may grant hardship extensions pursuant to criteria
adopted by the Commissioner in rule, including for medical necessity, lack of
reasonable accessible alternative placement, family-unity needs, imminent
severe weather, or imminent risk to health or safety, subject to written findings.
Where a denial of services or termination of services would likely result in
imminent risk to health or safety, the Department shall provide temporary
placement pending appeal or alternative accommodation.
Sec. 7. RIGHT TO FAIR HEARING
(a) Right to hearing. An applicant for, or participant in, the Program
established pursuant to this act shall have the right to a fair hearing before the
Human Services Board pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 3091 when:
(1) an application for assistance under the Program is denied in whole or
in part;
(2) a participant’s benefits are terminated, reduced, or suspended; or
(3) the applicant or participant believes that benefits have not been
provided in accordance with applicable laws, rules, or policies.
(b) Notice. Written notice shall be provided to any applicant or participant
whose participation in the Program is denied, reduced, suspended, or
terminated. Notice shall include:
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 19 of 30
(1) the specific factual and legal basis for the Department’s decision;
(2) the effective date of the action;
(3) a statement of the right to request a fair hearing pursuant to this
section; and
(4) clear instructions on the process and deadlines for filing an appeal.
(c) Timeliness of appeals. An individual shall file a request for a fair
hearing with the Human Services Board within 90 days following the date of
the individual’s receipt of the Department’s written notice.
(d) Continuation of benefits. If an individual files a request for a fair
hearing within 10 days after receiving the Department’s notice of termination
of services under the Program, the Department shall continue to provide
services under the Program without interruption until a decision is issued by
the Human Services Board, unless the participant voluntarily waives continued
benefits.
(e) Due process protections. Hearings shall be conducted in accordance
with due process standards, including the right to present evidence, cross-
examine witnesses, and be represented by counsel or another authorized
representative.
(f) Decision. The Human Services Board shall issue a written decision that
sets forth findings of fact, conclusions of law, and the basis for its decision.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 20 of 30
Sec. 8. HOTEL AND MOTEL USE
(a) The General Assembly finds that Vermont’s reliance on hotels and
motels for General Assistance emergency housing is unsustainable.
(b)(1) In fiscal year 2027, there shall be a maximum capacity of 400 hotel
and motel rooms for the Temporary Emergency Housing and Accountability
Program.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that hotel or motel rooms
authorized for use as part of the Temporary Emergency Housing and
Accountability Program be reduced to the minimum practicable level in fiscal
year 2028 and eliminated only upon certification from the Commissioner for
Children and Families to the House Committee on Human Services and to the
Senate Committee on Health and Welfare that sufficient shelter and housing
capacity exists statewide to meet demand.
(c) In fiscal years 2027 and 2028, the Department shall:
(1) increase VHIP-supported permanent housing units;
(2) expand shelter capacity statewide; and
(3) repurpose hotels and motels previously used for General Assistance
emergency housing into transitional or workforce housing.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, where no safe,
reasonable alternative exists and denial of a hotel or motel room would likely
result in imminent risk to health or safety, the Department may authorize
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 21 of 30
temporary hotel or motel placement pending appeal or transition to an
appropriate alternative.
Sec. 9. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE HOUSING
(a) Domestic violence survivors shall be served through a program
administered with Vermont domestic and sexual violence organizations under
contract with the Department that is separate from the Temporary Emergency
Housing and Accountability Program.
(b) Use of hotels and motels may continue for domestic violence survivors
where no discrete, safe housing alternatives exist. Hotel and motel usage by
domestic violence survivors shall not count toward the maximum capacities
identified in Sec. 8 of this act.
Sec. 10. COLD-WEATHER EMERGENCY SHELTER
(a) The Department shall maintain sufficient cold-weather emergency
shelter capacity to ensure that no individual is unsheltered during extreme
weather conditions.
(b) Eligibility for cold-weather shelter shall not be limited by residency,
disability, or time limits.
Sec. 11. RECOVERY AND TRANSITIONAL HOUSING
As recovery housing and transitional housing are integral components of the
tiered continuum of care, the Agency of Human Services shall:
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 22 of 30
(1) expand access to recovery housing for individuals exiting
incarceration or treatment for substance use disorder; and
(2) support transitional housing models that bridge emergency housing
assistance and permanent housing.
Sec. 12. WORKFORCE AND PROVIDER STABILITY
The Agency of Human Services shall prioritize workforce stability in the
implementation of this act, including:
(1) retention and recruitment incentives for shelter and housing staff;
(2) support for rural and mobile service delivery models; and
(3) expanded use of peer support and community-based staffing models.
Sec. 13. RULEMAKING
Pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the Commissioner shall adopt permanent
rules for the implementation of the Temporary Emergency Housing and
Accountability Program pursuant to this act as soon as feasible. While
permanent rules are pending, the Commissioner shall adopt emergency rules,
which shall be deemed to have met the standard in 3 V.S.A. § 844. Both the
emergency and permanent rules shall address:
(1) document verification protocols for residency and disability status;
(2) random or targeted audits of eligibility documentation; and
(3) coordination with other State and federal benefit programs to prevent
duplication.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 23 of 30
Sec. 14. PROGRAM INTEGRITY REPORT
On January 15, 2027 and 2028, the Commissioner for Children and
Families shall submit a written Program integrity report regarding the
Temporary Emergency Housing and Accountability Program to the House
Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and to the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare addressing:
(1) the number of fraud investigations initiated and resolved;
(2) the dollar value of improperly paid benefits recovered; and
(3) the effectiveness of the verification and enforcement measures
established in this act.
Sec. 15. TEMPORARY EMERGENCY HOUSING AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM; REPORT
(a) On January 15, 2027 and 2028, the Commissioner for Children and
Families shall submit a written report about the implementation of the
Temporary Emergency Housing and Accountability Program since the start of
the preceding fiscal year to the House Committees on Appropriations and on
Human Services and to the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on
Health and Welfare, with a copy posted on its website, addressing:
(1) the number of individuals and households served through the
Program, by household size and, if applicable, by eligibility category, region,
service provider, and core service category;
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 24 of 30
(2) Program expenditures, including cost per household;
(3) the number of households that have been successfully transitioned to
permanent housing since the previous reporting period, the types of housing
settings participants have been placed in, and any supportive services a
participant is receiving in conjunction with the participant’s housing;
(4) the number of individuals and households returning to homelessness
after placement in permanent housing and the reason for the return to
homelessness;
(5) the number of diversions from homelessness made during the
previous reporting period;
(6) change in shelter bed, nursing home, and residential care home
capacity since the previous reporting period;
(7) the average length of stay and outcomes following an individual’s or
household’s exit from the Program;
(8) the number of VHIP-supported units created and utilized for
individuals and households exiting the Program;
(9) the number of transitional recovery housing beds funded or utilized
under the Program;
(10) fraud prevention and enforcement data as required pursuant to Sec.
14 of this act;
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 25 of 30
(11) the total expenditures by category, including per-household cost
comparisons across hotels, shelters, and permanent housing options;
(12) the number of households whose intake assessment indicated a
potential need for services for each department within the Agency of Human
Services;
(13) workforce capacity, vacancy rates, and service delivery impacts;
and
(14) the identification of any indicators triggering a corrective action
plan, including:
(A) an increase in unsheltered homelessness;
(B) statewide shelter capacity utilization exceeding 95 percent for
more than 30 consecutive days; or
(C) sanctions imposed on more than 15 percent of Program
participants within a reporting period.
(b) If any indicator identified in subdivision (a)(14) of this section occurs,
the Department shall submit a corrective action plan to the House Committee
on Human Services and to the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare within
60 days following the occurrence.
Sec. 16. RETURN HOME PROGRAM
(a) As the General Assembly recognizes that with limited human services
resources, some individuals experiencing homelessness may find that their
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 26 of 30
families or home states are better equipped to provide long-term care and
support, there is established the Return Home Program administered by the
Department in fiscal years 2027 and 2028. The Return Home Program shall
provide travel expenses and relocation assistance for certain homeless
individuals who wish to return to their home states. For the purposes of this
Return Home Program, the Department shall:
(1) establish a public-private partnership for contracting with eligible
nonprofit organizations or for-profit organizations;
(2) seek the participation of local transportation providers;
(3) work with homeless outreach programs to ensure that:
(A) individuals who wish to participate in the Return Home Program
are made aware of the Program; and
(B) vulnerable populations, including victims of domestic violence or
human trafficking, are not involuntarily displaced and participation is strictly
voluntary;
(4) ensure that an individual may participate in the Program if the
individual:
(A) agrees to participate in the Return Home Program voluntarily and
provides informed, written consent;
(B) maintains legal residency in a state other than Vermont;
(C) does not have a verifiable permanent address in Vermont;
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 27 of 30
(D) lacks financial independence, including a return ticket or the
financial means to return home;
(E) is unemployed; and
(F) is reliant or at risk of becoming reliant on State assistance
programs;
(5) prohibit an individual with at least one dependent child who resides
in the State or an individual receiving medical treatment that cannot be
interrupted from participating in the Return Home Program;
(6) verify the information necessary to determine an individual’s
eligibility for the Return Home Program to prevent fraudulent claims or
involuntary displacement;
(7) enable an individual who alleges involuntary participation or who
wishes to participate, but is denied eligibility, to immediately appeal the
decision to the Human Services Board;
(8) provide written disclosure in the individual’s primary language and
provide interpreter services as needed, and a 72-hour cooling-off period before
travel, which the individual may request to waive; and
(9) submit a report on January 15, 2027 and 2028, to the House
Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and to the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare on the Return Home
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 28 of 30
Program addressing the number of participants, costs, outcomes, and any
recommended legislation.
(b) The Department shall not take an adverse action or denial of other
services against an individual for the individual’s refusal to participate in the
Return Home Program. The Department shall not condition other benefits on
the individual’s agreement to relocate under this section.
(c) Appeals related to Return Home Program determinations shall receive
expedited review within five business days and relocation shall be
automatically stayed pending decisions unless the applicant requests
immediate travel.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Home state” means an individual’s state of legal residence.
(2) “Permanent address” means a verifiable physical residence that an
individual owns, rents, or resides in with family.
(3) “State assistance programs” means programs providing aid, such as
subsidies, unemployment benefits, or any other form of public aid.
Sec. 17. APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In fiscal year 2027, $30,000,000.00 is appropriated to the Department
from the General Fund for the following purposes:
(1) $10,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department to operate the
Temporary Emergency Housing and Accountability Program.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 29 of 30
(2) $6,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department to expand statewide
shelter capacity.
(3) $4,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department to contract for
additional transitional and recovery housing developments.
(4) $4,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department to contract for the
repurposing of hotels and motels previously used for General Assistance
emergency housing into transitional and workforce housing.
(5) $6,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department for the expansion of
VHIP-supported permanent housing units.
(b) In fiscal year 2028, it is the intent of the General Assembly to
appropriate $25,000,000.00 from the General Fund to the Department for the
following purposes:
(1) $8,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department to operate the
Temporary Emergency Housing and Accountability Program.
(2) $6,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department to expand statewide
shelter capacity.
(3) $3,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department to contract for
additional transitional and recovery housing developments.
(4) $3,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department to contract for the
repurposing of hotels and motels previously used for General Assistance
emergency housing into transitional and workforce housing.
VT LEG #386115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.594
2026 Page 30 of 30
(5) $5,000,000.00 shall be used by the Department for the expansion of
VHIP-supported permanent housing units.
(c) Any fiscal year 2027 unexpended funds shall be carried forward to
expand VHIP-supported housing units or expand shelter, recovery housing, or
transitional housing capacity, or both. It is the intent of the General Assembly
that any unexpended funds in fiscal year 2028 related to the Temporary
Emergency Housing and Accountability Program be carried forward for the
same purposes. Any funds carried forward pursuant to this section shall be
identified in the report required pursuant to Sec. 15 of this act.
Sec. 18. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386115 v.2